Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2208
Area agency on aging, defined.

Area agency on aging shall mean the agency formed or eligible pursuant to the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act which is designated by the department as responsible for the administration of the area program plan in each planning-and-service area.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 8.